North Carolina statutes. Chapter 6. Liability for Court Costs.
Article 5. Liability of Counties in Criminal Actions.

§§ 6-36 through 6-39.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-40.
Liability of counties, where trial removed from one county to another.

When a prisoner is sent from one county to another to be held for trial, or for any other cause or purpose, the county from which he is sent shall pay his jail expenses, unless they are collected from the prisoner.

History.

1889, c. 354; 1901, c. 718; Rev., s. 1285; C.S., s. 1263; 1971, c. 269, s. 8.

§§ 6-41 through 6-44.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.